zh-CN: 包含的口腔护理用品: 牙线; 口腔镜; 牙线棒; 齿间刷; 漱口水; 正畸蜡; 舌苔刮板; 牙刷; 牙膏; 牙签; 其他
lt-LT: Įtraukti burnos priežiūros daiktai: Dantų siūlas; Odontologinis veidrodėlis; Dantų siūlo krapštukai; Tarpdančių šepetėlis; Burnos skalavimo skystis; Ortodontinis vaškas; Liežuvio grandiklis; Dantų šepetėlis; Dantų pasta; Plona geležte; Kita
nl: Meegeleverde mondverzorgingsitems: Tandzijde; Tandspiegel; Floss picks; Interdentale borstel; Mondwater; Orthodontische was; Tongschraper; Tandenborstel; Tandpasta; Tandenstoker; Andere
da: Mundplejeprodukter inkluderet: Tandtråd; Tandlægespejl; Tandstikkere med tråd; Interdental børste; Mundskyl; Ortodontisk voks; Tungeskraber; Tandbørste; Tandpasta; Tandstikker; Andet
pl: Zawarte produkty do pielęgnacji jamy ustnej: Nić dentystyczna; Lusterko dentystyczne; Wykałaczki z nicią; Szczoteczka międzyzębowa; Płyny do płukania jamy ustnej; Wosk ortodontyczny; Skrobak do języka; Szczoteczka do zębów; Pasty do zębów; Wykałaczka; Inne
sk-SK: Produkty ústnej starostlivosti v balení: Zubná niť; Zubné zrkadlo; Špáradlá s niťou; Medzizubná kefka; Ústna voda; Ortodontický vosk; Škrabka na jazyk; Zubná kefka; Zubná pasta; Toothpick; Iné
nb: Munnpleieartikler inkludert: Tanntråd; Tannspeil; Tanntrådholdere; Interdentalbørste; Munnrens; Ortodontisk voks; Tungeskraper; Tannbørste; Tannpasta; Tannpirker; Annet
hr-HR: Uključeni proizvodi za oralnu njegu: Zubni konac; Dentalno ogledalo; Čačkalice s koncem; Interdentalna četkica; Vodica za ispiranje usta; Ortodontski vosak; Strugač za jezik; Četkica za zube; Pasta za zube; Toothpick; Ostalo
tr: Dahil edilen ağız bakım ürünleri: Diş ipi; Diş aynası; Diş ipi çubukları; Diş arası fırçası; Ağız Çalkalama Suları; Ortodontik mum; Dil kazıyıcı; Diş fırçası; Diş Macunları; Kürdan; Diğer
zh-TW: 口腔護理包含用品: 牙線; 牙科用鏡; 牙線棒; 齒間刷; 漱口水; 矯正蠟; 刮舌器; 牙刷; 牙膏; 牙籤; 其他
sl-SI: Vključeni izdelki ustne nege: Zobna nitka; Zobno ogledalo; Zobotrebci z nitko; Medzobna ščetka; Ustna vodica; Ortodontski vosek; Strgalo za jezik; Zobna ščetka; Zobna pasta; Žepni dolgi; Drugo
it: Articoli per la cura orale inclusi: Filo interdentale; Specchio dentale; Archetti interdentali; Spazzolino interdentale; Collutorio; Cera ortodontica; Raschietto per lingua; Spazzolino; Dentifricio; Toothpick; Altro
vi: Các mặt hàng chăm sóc răng miệng đi kèm: Chỉ nha khoa; Gương nha khoa; Tăm chỉ; Bàn chải kẽ răng; Nước súc miệng; Sáp niềng răng; Cạo lưỡi; Bàn chải đánh răng; Kem đánh răng; Dao nhọn; Khác
de: Enthaltene Mundpflegeartikel: Zahnseide; Dentalspiegel; Zahnseidesticks; Interdentalbürste; Mundwasser; Kieferorthopädisches Wachs; Zungenschaber; Zahnbürste; Zahnpasta; Toothpick; Sonstiges
ko: 포함된 구강 관리 제품: 치실; 치아거울; 치실픽; 치간 칫솔; 구강세척제; 교정용 왁스; 혀 클리너; 칫솔; 치약; 이쑤시개; 기타
fi: Mukana tulevat suunhoitotuotteet: Hammaslanka; Hammaspeili; Lankatikit; Hammasväliharja; Suuvesi; Oikomishoidon vaha; Kielen kaavin; Hammasharja; Hammastahna; Hammastikku; Muu
en: Oral care items included: Dental floss; Dental mirror; Floss picks; Interdental brush; Mouthwash; Orthodontic wax; Tongue scraper; Toothbrush; Toothpaste; Toothpick; Other
pt-BR: Itens de cuidados orais incluídos: Fio dental; Espelho dentário; Palitos com fio dental; Escova interdental; Antisséptico bucal; Cera ortodôntica; Raspador de língua; Escova de dentes; Pasta de dente; Palito de dente; Outro
hu: Mellékelt szájápolási termékek: Fogselyem; Fogászati tükör; Fogpiszkáló selyemmel; Interdentális kefe; Szájvíz; Fogszabályozó viasz; Nyelvkaparó; Fogkefe; Fogkrémek; Fogpiszkáló; Egyéb
ru: Состав набора для ухода за полостью рта: Зубная нить; Стоматологическое зеркало; Флоссы-палочки; Интердентальная щетка; Ополаскиватели для полости рта; Ортодонтический воск; Скребок для языка; Зубная щетка; Зубная паста; Зубочистка; Другой
fr: Articles de soin bucco-dentaire inclus: Fil dentaire; Miroir dentaire; Porte-fils dentaires; Brossette interdentaire; Bains de bouche; Cire orthodontique; Gratte-langue; Brosse à dents; Dentifrice; Cure-dent; Autre
bg-BG: Включени предмети за орална грижа: Зъбен конец; Зъболекарско огледало; Клечки с конец; Интердентална четка; Вода за уста; Ортодонтски восък; Стъргалка за език; Четка за зъби; Паста за зъби; Клечка за зъби; Други
cs: Zahrnuté položky ústní péče: Zubní nit; Zubní zrcátko; Párátka s nití; Mezizubní kartáček; Ústní voda; Ortodontický vosk; Škrabka na jazyk; Zubní kartáček; Zubní pasty; Toothpick; Jiné
ro-RO: Definește factorul de formă general al capului periuței, care afectează accesul și adecvarea pentru diferiți utilizatori: Ață dentară; Oglindă dentară; Bețișoare cu ață dentară; Periuță interdentală; Apă de gură; Ceară ortodontică; Răzuitoare de limbă; Periuță de dinți; Pastă de dinți; Toothpick; Altele
th: สินค้าดูแลช่องปากที่รวมอยู่: ไหมขัดฟัน; กระจกทันตกรรม; ไม้จิ้มฟันมีไหม; แปรงซอกฟัน; น้ำยาบ้วนปาก; ขี้ผึ้งสำหรับจัดฟัน; ที่ขูดลิ้น; แปรงสีฟัน; ยาสีฟัน; Toothpick; อื่นๆ
sv: Inkluderade munvårdsprodukter: Tandtråd; Munspegel; Tandtrådspinnar; Mellanrumsborste; Munvatten; Ortodontiskt vax; Tungskrapa; Tandborste; Tandkräm; Tandpetare; Övrigt
es: Artículos de cuidado bucal incluidos: Hilo dental; Espejo dental; Palillos con hilo dental; Cepillo interdental; Enjuagues bucales; Cera de ortodoncia; Raspador de lengua; Cepillo de dientes; Pasta de dientes; Palillo; Otros
ja: 含まれるオーラルケアアイテム: デンタルフロス; 歯科用ミラー; フロスピック; 歯間ブラシ; マウスウォッシュ; 矯正用ワックス; 舌スクレーパー; 歯ブラシ; 歯磨き粉; 爪楊枝; その他
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα είδη στοματικής φροντίδας: Οδοντικό νήμα; Οδοντιατρικός καθρέφτης; Οδοντογλυφίδες με νήμα; Μεσοδόντιο βουρτσάκι; Στοματικό διάλυμα; Ορθοδοντικό κερί; Ξύστρα γλώσσας; Οδοντόβουρτσα; Οδοντόκρεμα; Toothpick; Άλλο
pt-PT: Itens de cuidados orais incluídos: Fio dentário; Espelho odontológico; Palitos com fio dentário; Escova interdentária; Elixires; Cera ortodôntica; Raspador de língua; Escova de dentes; Pastas de dentes; Palito de dentes; Outro